South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S30.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-26-110(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Beginning with the 2013-2014 2025-2026school year, the Department of Education shall require two hours of training in youth suicide awareness and prevention as a requirement for the renewal of credentials of individuals employed in a kindergarten, elementary, middle school secondary school, junior high school, or high school as defined in Section 59-1-150, or an institution of higher education. The required training shall count toward the one hundred twenty renewal credits specified in Department of Education regulations for renewal of credentials. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----